Utah statutes.
70A-2a-524.   Lessor's right to identify goods to lease contract.

(1)  A lessor aggrieved under Section 70A-2a-523 may:

(a)  identify to the lease contract conforming goods not already identified if at the time the lessor learned of the default they were in the lessor's or the supplier's possession or control; and

(b)  dispose of goods as provided in Subsection 70A-2a-527(1) that demonstrably have been intended for the particular lease contract even though those goods are unfinished.

(2)  If the goods are unfinished, in the exercise of reasonable commercial judgment for the purposes of avoiding loss and of effective realization, an aggrieved lessor or the supplier may either complete manufacture and wholly identify the goods to the lease contract or cease manufacture and lease, sell, or otherwise dispose of the goods for scrap or salvage value or proceed in any other reasonable manner.

